Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2502.04
Declaration of policy.

The Legislature further declares that it shall be the policy of the State of Nebraska, through the implementation of the Early Intervention Act, to promote, facilitate, and support:

(1) Healthy families, enhancing the well-being of each family member as well as that of the family as a unit and encouraging family independence and decisionmaking about the future of their children;

(2) Service systems which are responsive, flexible, integrated, and accessible to children and their families;

(3) Community ownership, recognizing that families live and children grow up in communities, that programs are implemented in communities, and that all families need supportive communities; and

(4) Maximum impact of prevention and early intervention, encouraging and supporting active parent and family partnership in all programs and services.

Laws 1993, LB 520, § 5.